Georgia, session 2025_26, HB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to revenue and taxation, is
amended in Code Section 48-7-40.22, relating to tax credits for business enterprises that
purchase or lease a motor vehicle to provide transportation for employees, by revising
subsection (h) as follows:
"(h) This Code section shall stand repealed and reserved on December 31, 2029 2025."
H. B. 165
- 1 -

LC 50 0947
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising paragraphs (24), (60), and (103) of Code Section
48-8-3, relating to exemptions from sales and use taxes, as follows:
"(24) The rental of videotape or motion picture film to any person who charges an
admission fee to view such film or videotape Reserved;"
"(60)(A) The sale of machinery and equipment which is incorporated into any
telecommunications manufacturing facility and used for the primary purpose of
improving air quality in advanced technology clean rooms of Class 100,000 or less,
provided such clean rooms are used directly in the manufacture of tangible personal
property.
(B) This paragraph shall stand repealed and reserved on December 31, 2029 Reserved;"
"(103) Sales of tangible personal property used in direct connection with the
construction, renovation, or rehabilitation of affordable housing by an organization which
is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code Reserved;"
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 165
- 2 -